Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-501
Residence requirement; restriction; home rule charter; legislative findings and declarations.

No person to be elected to office at any election or nominated at any primary election, except for state officers, shall be required to meet a residence requirement of longer than six months in order to be eligible to be a candidate for such office. The Legislature finds and declares that the election of public officials and the qualifications related thereto are a matter of general statewide concern notwithstanding the provisions of any home rule charter.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 97.

The provisions of the act creating an office control the election of the officers and their terms of office. Saling v. Bahensky, 97 Neb. 789, 151 N.W. 320 (1915).